Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-1957
Participation in quality rating and
improvement system.

Application to participate in the quality rating and improvement
system shall be voluntary for applicable child care and early childhood education
programs with the following exceptions:

(1) Beginning
July 1, 2014, and not later than December 31, 2014, each applicable child
care or early childhood education program that received over five hundred
thousand dollars in child care assistance pursuant to section 68-1202 for
FY2011-12 shall apply to participate in the quality rating and improvement
system and shall be assigned a quality scale rating as provided in sections
71-1956 and 71-1958;

(2) Beginning July 1, 2015, and not later than December 31, 2015,
each applicable child care or early childhood education program that received
over two hundred fifty thousand dollars in child care assistance pursuant
to section 68-1202 for FY2011-12 shall apply to participate in the quality
rating and improvement system and shall be assigned a quality scale rating
as provided in sections 71-1956 and 71-1958; and

(3) Beginning July 1,
2016, each applicable child care or early childhood education program that
received over two hundred fifty thousand dollars in child care assistance
pursuant to section 68-1202 in the preceding fiscal year shall, not later
than December 31 of the applicable year or six months after actual receipt
of such assistance, whichever is later, apply to participate in the quality
rating and improvement system and shall be assigned a quality scale rating
as provided in sections 71-1956 and 71-1958.

Laws 2013, LB507, § 6.
September 6, 2013